Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds that Antifa and Black Lives Matter (BLM)


are militarist, anarchist enterprises that explicitly call for the


overthrow of the United States government, law enforcement


authorities, and our system of law. Antifa and BLM use illegal


means to organize and execute a campaign of violence and terrorism


nationwide to accomplish these goals. This campaign involves


coordinated efforts to obstruct enforcement of federal laws through


armed standoffs with law enforcement, organized riots, violent


assaults on Immigration and Customs Enforcement and other law


enforcement officers, and routine doxing of and other threats

Req. No. 3525 Page 1


against political figures and activists. Antifa and BLM recruit,


train, and radicalize young Americans to engage in this violence and


suppression of political activity, then employ elaborate means and


mechanisms to shield the identities of their operatives, conceal


their funding sources and operations in an effort to frustrate law


enforcement, and recruit additional members. Individuals associated


with and acting on behalf of Antifa and BLM further coordinate with


other organizations and entities for the purpose of spreading,


fomenting, and advancing political violence and suppressing lawful


political speech. This organized effort designed to achieve policy


objectives by coercion and intimidation is domestic terrorism.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Because of the pattern of political violence designed to


suppress lawful political activity and obstruct the rule of law, the


Legislature hereby designates Antifa and Black Lives Matter (BLM) as


domestic terrorist organizations. All relevant state departments


and agencies shall utilize all applicable authorities to


investigate, disrupt, and dismantle any and all illegal operations,


especially those involving terrorist actions, conducted by Antifa,


BLM, or any person claiming to act on behalf of Antifa or BLM, or


for which Antifa, BLM, or any person claiming to act on behalf of


Antifa or BLM provided material support, including necessary

Req. No. 3525 Page 2


investigatory and prosecutorial actions against those who fund such


operations.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3525 BLB 1/14/2026 2:56:50 PM

































Req. No. 3525 Page 3